Maryland, session 2025, HB0073.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
4–318.
This Part III of this subtitle does not apply to:
(5) lease transactions involving [less than 2,500] UP TO 5,000 square feet
of property.
4–320.
(a) IN THIS SECTION, “EMARYLAND MARKETPLACE” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 13–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) The Department shall advertise any need of the State to rent building space
at least [30] 20 days before proposals for a lease are due.
[(b)] (C) The Department shall advertise the proposed leasing:
– 1 –

Ch. 75 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) [in daily or weekly newspapers with circulation sufficient to provide
notice:
(1) to the people of the State, OR AT LEAST TO THE PEOPLE OF THE
AFFECTED LOCALITY; or AND
(2) at least to the people of the affected locality] TO THE PEOPLE OF THE
STATE, OR AT LEAST TO THE PEOPLE OF THE AFFECTED LOCALITY, AND POTENTIAL
BIDDERS BY POSTING A PUBLICATION ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE AND
EMARYLAND MARKETPLACE.
[(c)] (D) The advertisement shall contain:
(1) the number of square feet proposed to be leased; and
(2) the general area in which the State desires to lease the space.
13–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “eMaryland Marketplace” or “eMaryland Marketplace Advantage” means the
Internet–based procurement system managed by the Department of General Services.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 2 –